Utah statutes.
58-1-303.   Temporary license.

(1) (a)  The division may issue a temporary license to a person who has met all license requirements except the passing of an examination. In this case:

(i)  the licensee shall take the next available examination; and

(ii)  the temporary license automatically expires upon release of official examination results if the applicant fails the examination.

(b)  The division may issue a temporary license to a person licensed in another state or country who is in Utah temporarily to teach or assist a Utah resident licensed to practice an occupation or profession under this title.

(c)  The division may issue a temporary license to a person licensed in another state who met the requirements for licensure in that state, which were equal to or greater than the requirements for licensure of this state at the time the license was obtained in the other state, upon a finding by the division, in collaboration with the appropriate board, that the issuance of a temporary license is necessary to or justified by:

(i)  a local or national emergency or any governmental action causing an unusual circumstance that might be reasonably considered to materially jeopardize the public health, safety, or welfare if a temporary license is not issued;

(ii)  a lack of necessary available services in any community or area of the state from an occupation or profession licensed under this title, if the lack of services might be reasonably considered to materially jeopardize the public health, safety, or welfare if a temporary license is not issued; or

(iii)  a need to first observe an applicant for licensure in this state in a monitored or supervised practice of the applicant's occupation or profession before a decision is made by the division either to grant or deny the applicant a regular license.

(2)  The division may not issue a temporary license to a person who qualifies for one under Subsection (1)(a) more than three consecutive times within the three-year period immediately following the issuance of the first temporary license.

(3)  The division may not issue a temporary license to a person solely because there is a competitive advantage enjoyed or a competitive disadvantage suffered by any party caused by the absence of a licensed person, unless in addition there is or will be a material risk presented to the public health, safety, or welfare.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

